Utah statutes.
62A-4a-202.8.   Child protection team meeting -- Timing.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), if the division files a petition under Section 78A-6-304, the division shall convene a child protection team meeting to:

(a)  review the circumstances of the filing of the petition; and

(b)  develop or review implementation of a safety plan to protect the child from further abuse, neglect, or dependency.

(2)  The child protection team meeting required under Subsection (1) shall be held within the shorter of:

(a)  14 days of the day on which the petition is filed under Section 78A-6-304 if the conditions of Subsection (2)(b) or (c) are not met;

(b)  24 hours of the filing of the petition under Section 78A-6-304, excluding weekends and holidays, if the child who is the subject of the petition will likely be taken into protective custody unless there is an expedited hearing and services ordered under the protective supervision of the court; or

(c)  24 hours after receipt of a child into protective custody, excluding weekends and holidays, if the child is taken into protective custody as provided in Section 62A-4a-202.3.

(3)  The child protection team shall include as many persons under Subsection 62A-4a-202.3(6)(b) as appropriate.

(4)  At its meeting the child protection team shall review the complete child protective services and foster care history of the child and the child's parents and siblings.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

